Florida, session 2026, SB1706.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSubsections (1), (2), and (5) of section 28 215.55871, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 29 215.55871âMy Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program.âThere 30 is established within the Department of Financial Services the 31 My Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program to be implemented 32 pursuant to appropriations. The department shall provide fiscal 33 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership 34 for the pilot program, consistent with this section. This 35 section does not create an entitlement for associations or unit 36 owners or obligate the state in any way to fund the inspection 37 or retrofitting of condominiums in the state. Implementation of 38 this pilot program is subject to annual legislative 39 appropriations. It is the intent of the Legislature that the My 40 Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program provide licensed 41 inspectors to perform inspections for and grants to eligible 42 associations as funding allows. 43 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 44 (a)ââArea median incomeâ means the median household income, 45 as published annually by the United States Department of Housing 46 and Urban Development, for the county in which the condominium 47 property is located. 48 (b)(a)ââAssociationâ has the same meaning as in s. 718.103. 49 (c)(b)ââAssociation propertyâ means property, real and 50 personal, which is owned or leased by, or is dedicated by a 51 recorded plat to, an association for the use and benefit of its 52 members and is located in the service area. 53 (d)(c)ââBoard of administrationâ has the same meaning as in 54 s. 718.103. 55 (e)(d)ââCondominiumâ has the same meaning as in s. 718.103. 56 For purposes of this section, the term does not include detached 57 units on individual parcels of land. 58 (f)(e)ââCondominium propertyâ means the lands, leaseholds, 59 and personal property that are subjected to condominium 60 ownership, whether or not contiguous, and all improvements 61 thereon and all easements and rights appurtenant thereto 62 intended for use in connection with the condominium and are 63 located in the service area. 64 (g)(f)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Financial 65 Services. 66 (h)(g)ââPropertyâ means association property and 67 condominium property, as applicable, located in the service 68 area. 69 (h)ââService areaâ means the area of the state which is 15 70 miles inward of a coastline, as that term is defined in s. 71 376.031. 72 (i)ââUnitâ has the same meaning as in s. 718.103. 73 (j)ââUnit ownerâ has the same meaning as in s. 718.103. 74 (2)âPARTICIPATION.â 75 (a)âParticipation in the pilot program is limited to: 76 1.âCondominium associations in which the structures or 77 buildings on the condominium property were constructed before 78 January 1, 2008. 79 2.âCondominium associations in which at least 80 percent of 80 the occupied units within the condominium property are owned and 81 occupied by a person or family whose household annual income is 82 at or below 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for 83 household size, applicable to the county in which the 84 condominium is located. Eligibility must be determined using the 85 area median income published at the time an application is 86 submitted. For purposes of determining whether a condominium 87 association meets the 80 percent unit-occupied threshold: 88 a.âOnly occupied residential units may be counted. 89 b.âOwner-occupied residential units may be counted as long 90 as the persons or families living in such residential units 91 provide income documentation to the department and the 92 department has verified that such person or family meets the 93 income requirements of this subparagraph. 94 3.âStructures or buildings on the condominium property 95 which are three or more stories in height, provided that each 96 structure or building that is the subject of a mitigation grant 97 contains at least two single-family dwellings. 98 (b)âThe department shall adopt rules establishing 99 acceptable methods for verifying household income, including, 100 but not limited to, owner self-certification, tax returns, 101 income statements, or other documentation deemed sufficient by 102 the department. The department may require periodic 103 recertification of income eligibility to ensure compliance with 104 this section. 105 (c)âA condominium property with mixed-income occupancies is 106 eligible to participate in the pilot program under this section 107 if the income threshold in subparagraph (a)2. is met. 108 (d)(b)âIn order to apply for an inspection under subsection 109 (4) or a grant under subsection (5) for association property or 110 condominium property, an association must receive approval by a 111 majority vote of the board of administration or a majority vote 112 of the total voting interests of the association to participate 113 in the pilot program. An association may not apply for an 114 inspection under subsection (4) or a grant under subsection (5) 115 for association property or condominium property unless the 116 association has complied with the inspection requirements in ss. 117 553.899 and 718.112(2)(g) and (h). An association may not apply 118 for a grant under sub-subparagraph (5)(e)1.a. subparagraph 119 (5)(e)1. for association property or condominium property unless 120 the windows of the association property or condominium property 121 are established as common elements in the declaration. 122 (e)(c)âIn order to apply for a grant under subsection (5) 123 which improves one or more units within a condominium, an 124 association must receive both of the following: 125 1.âApproval by a majority vote of the board of 126 administration or a majority vote of the total voting interests 127 of the association to participate in a mitigation inspection. 128 2.âApproval by at least 75 percent of all unit owners who 129 reside within the structure or building that is the subject of 130 the mitigation grant. 131 (f)(d)âA unit owner may participate in the pilot program 132 through a mitigation grant awarded to the association but may 133 not participate individually in the pilot program. 134 (g)(e)âThe votes required under this subsection may take 135 place at the annual budget meeting of the association or at a 136 unit owner meeting called for the purpose of taking such vote. 137 Before a vote of the unit owners may be taken, the association 138 must provide to the unit owners a clear disclosure of the pilot 139 program on a form created by the department. The president and 140 the treasurer of the board of administration must sign the 141 disclosure form indicating that a copy of the form was provided 142 to each unit owner of the association. The signed disclosure 143 form and the minutes from the meeting at which the unit owners 144 voted to participate in the pilot program must be maintained as 145 part of the official records of the association. Within 14 days 146 after an affirmative vote to participate in the pilot program, 147 the association must provide written notice in the same manner 148 as required under s. 718.112(2)(d) to all unit owners of the 149 decision to participate in the pilot program. 150 (5)âMITIGATION GRANTS.âFinancial grants may be used by 151 associations to make improvements that recommended in a 152 hurricane mitigation inspection report which increase the 153 condominiumâs resistance to hurricane damage as provided in this 154 subsection. 155 (a)âAn application for a mitigation grant must: 156 1.âContain a signed or electronically verified statement 157 made under penalty of perjury by the president of the board of 158 administration that the association has submitted only a single 159 application for each property that the association operates or 160 maintains. 161 2.âInclude a notarized statement from the president of the 162 board of administration containing the name and license number 163 of each contractor the association intends to use for the 164 mitigation project. 165 3.âInclude a notarized statement from the president of the 166 board of administration which commits to the department that the 167 association will complete the mitigation improvements. If the 168 grant will be used to improve units, the application must also 169 include an acknowledged statement from each unit owner who is 170 required to provide approval for a grant under paragraph (2)(e) 171 (2)(c). 172 4.âInclude documentation deemed sufficient by the 173 department under paragraph (2)(b) for verifying household 174 income. 175 (b)âAn association may select its own contractors for the 176 mitigation project as long as each contractor meets all 177 qualification, certification, or licensing requirements in 178 general law. A mitigation project must be performed by a 179 properly licensed contractor who has secured all required local 180 permits necessary for the project. The department must 181 electronically verify that the contractorâs state license number 182 is accurate and up to date before approving a grant application. 183 (c)âAn association awarded a grant must complete the entire 184 mitigation project in order to receive the final grant award and 185 must agree to make the property available for a final inspection 186 once the mitigation project is finished to ensure the mitigation 187 improvements are completed in a manner consistent with the 188 intent of the pilot program and meet or exceed the applicable 189 Florida Building Code requirements. Construction must be 190 completed and the association must submit a request to the 191 department for a final inspection, or request an extension of 192 time, within 1 year after receiving grant approval. If the 193 association fails to comply with this paragraph, the application 194 is deemed abandoned and the grant money reverts back to the 195 department. 196 (d)âGrant projects shall be funded as follows: 197 1.âAll grants must be matched on the basis of $1 provided 198 by the association for $2 provided by the state toward the 199 actual cost of the project. 200 2.âAn association may receive grant funds for both roof 201 related and opening protection-related projects, but the maximum 202 total grant award may not exceed $175,000 per association. 203 3.âThe department may not accept grant applications or 204 maintain a waiting list for grants after the cumulative value of 205 the grants awarded have fully obligated the appropriation, 206 unless otherwise expressly authorized by the Legislature. 207 (e)âGrant funds may only be used for the following: 208 1.âwater intrusion mitigation devices or Mitigation 209 improvements recommended in a hurricane mitigation inspection 210 report which that will result in a mitigation credit, discount, 211 or other rate differential for the building or structure to 212 which the improvement is such device or improvement is applied 213 or made, including. When recommended by a hurricane mitigation 214 inspection report, grants for eligible associations may be used 215 for the following improvements: 216 a.1.âOpening protection improvements, including all of the 217 following: 218 (I)a.âExterior doors. 219 (II)b.âGarage doors. 220 (III)c.âWindows. 221 (IV)d.âSkylights. 222 b.2.âRoof improvements, including all of the following: 223 (I)a.âReinforcing roof-to-wall connections. 224 (II)b.âImproving the strength of roof-deck attachments. 225 (III)c.âInstalling secondary water resistance for the roof. 226 (IV)d.âReplacing the roof covering. 227 2.âWater intrusion mitigation devices designed to prevent 228 wind-driven rainwater intrusion through the tracks of sliding 229 glass doors. Grant funds authorized under this subparagraph are 230 not contingent upon a recommendation in a hurricane mitigation 231 inspection report. However, a hurricane mitigation inspector 232 must verify the use of such a device. 233 (f)âExcept for the water intrusion mitigation devices as 234 specified in subparagraph (e)2., mitigation improvements must be 235 identified in the final hurricane mitigation inspection report 236 in order for an association to receive grant funds. 237 (g)âIf improvements to protect the property which that 238 complied with the current applicable building code at the time 239 have been previously installed, the association must use a 240 mitigation grant to install improvements that do both of the 241 following: 242 1.âComply with or exceed the applicable building code in 243 effect at the time the association applied for the grant. 244 2.âProvide more hurricane protection than the improvements 245 that the association previously installed. 246 (h)âThe association may not use a mitigation grant to: 247 1.âInstall the same type of improvements that were 248 previously installed; or 249 2.âPay a deductible for a pending insurance claim for 250 damage that is part of the property for which grant funds are 251 being received. 252 (i)âThe department shall develop a process that ensures the 253 most efficient means to collect and verify inspection and grant 254 applications to determine eligibility. The department may direct 255 hurricane mitigation inspectors to collect and verify inspection 256 and grant application information or use the Internet or other 257 electronic means to collect information and determine 258 eligibility. 259 (j)âGrant funds may only be awarded for a mitigation 260 improvement that addresses the common elements of the 261 condominium property that will result in a mitigation credit, 262 discount, or other rate differential for the building or 263 structure to which the improvement is made. As a condition of 264 receiving awarding a grant, the association department must 265 complete 100 percent of the opening protection improvements to 266 the common elements which were recommended in the final 267 hurricane mitigation inspection report require mitigation 268 improvements to be made to all openings, including exterior 269 doors, garage doors, windows, and skylights that are a part of 270 the common elements, if doing so is necessary for the building 271 or structure to qualify for a mitigation credit, discount, or 272 other rate differential. 273 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.